Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1910
Sections, how construed.

Sections 29-1906 to 29-1911 shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate their general purpose to make uniform the law of the states which enact them. They shall be construed as supplemental to and cumulative with section 29-1904.

Laws 1937, c. 71, § 5, p. 260;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 29-1910;

R.S.1943, § 29-1910.